Hawaii statutes.
[§329D-8] Laboratory standards and testing;
laboratory certification. (a) The department shall establish and enforce
standards for laboratory-based testing of marijuana and manufactured marijuana
products for content, contamination, and consistency.

(b) The department may certify laboratories
that can test marijuana and manufactured marijuana products prior to the sale
of marijuana and manufactured marijuana products. [L 2015, c 241, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next